Massachusetts, session 194th, H1651.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, the court
administrator of the executive office of the trial court shall, not later than December 31, 2025,
relocate the Cambridge district court, also known as the third district court of eastern Middlesex,
from the city of Medford, where it has been located since 2009 in contravention of section 1 of
chapter 218, to the city of Cambridge.
SECTION 2. Within 90 days of the effective date of this act, the executive office of the
trial court shall issue a report on the timeline for relocating the Cambridge district court.
of 1